South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Official state song SECTION 1.    Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-687. "Carolina When I Die" by Patrick Davis is designated as an official state song. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________